voicethread
Home
Browse
Products
K-12
Higher Ed
Business
About
Features
Blog
Research
Jobs
How to
Contact
Training
Free Workshops
VT Certification
Digital Library
Sign in
Register
Agreeing to our Terms of Service
Date Last Modified: April 2024
The
ed.voicethread.com
and
voicethread.com
websites (the “
Websites
”), the VoiceThread mobile applications (the “
Apps
”), and the related online and mobile services (collectively with the Website and the App, the “
Services
”) are made available by VoiceThread Inc., a Delaware corporation (“
VoiceThread
”), subject to these Terms and Conditions. Certain provisions in the proceeding paragraphs may only apply to certain portions of the Services.
By accessing any part of the Services, you are agreeing to the Terms and Conditions described below (the “
Terms and Conditions
” or “
Terms
”) AND THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF OUR
PRIVACY NOTICE
(the “Privacy Notice”), WHICH ARE INCORPORATED HEREIN BY REFERENCE. If you do not agree to any of these Terms, you should not use the Services. If you are otherwise engaged with VoiceThread for specific Services through a subsequent agreement, that agreement shall control and supersede these Terms and Conditions.
PLEASE READ THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS CAREFULLY. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS, DO NOT DOWNLOAD THE APPS OR CONTINUE TO ACCESS OR USE THE SERVICES AND DO NOT REGISTER FOR AN ACCOUNT.
These Terms and Conditions apply to all Users, including Users who are simply viewing content available via the Service, Users utilizing free Services, and Users who have engaged for paid Services. Users include, but are not limited to, students, parents, educators, academic institutions, or administrators (collectively, “
Users,
” “you” and through similar words such as “your,” etc.). Not all Terms shall apply to all types of Users where specified in the Terms and Conditions. Please note, these Terms and Conditions are offered in multiple languages consistent with the version of the platform you are using. To ensure you are viewing in the appropriate language, please review these Terms as connected via your instance of the platform.
If you are under the age of 13, you are not permitted to register for an Account (defined below) on the Services.
Registering or creating an account on the K-12 focused service ed.voicethread.com may only be completed, or facilitated by, an educator, school administrator, or other school official.
If you are a member of an organization, such as a school district, university, or other, similar educational institution, your organization may have engaged VoiceThread under a separate written agreement. Such agreement is separate from these Terms and Conditions and, in the event such agreement conflicts with these Terms and Conditions, that agreement shall control and supersede these Terms and Conditions. If you are entering into these Terms and Conditions on behalf of your organization, you represent that you have the authority to bind such entity to these Terms and Conditions. If you do not have such authority or otherwise do not agree to these Terms and Conditions, you should not use or access the Services. You must be a grade school educator or administrator to register for the portion of the Services available on ed.voicethread.com.
We reserve the right to refuse a User’s access to the Service for any reason, at our sole discretion. In addition, at our sole discretion, we may suspend or terminate a User’s Account (described below) for any reason. Such termination of your Account will result in your loss of access to the Services. We will not be liable for any decision to suspend, terminate or refuse service under any circumstances.
The Service is controlled and offered by us from our facilities in the United States of America. Except as indicated in these Terms and the
Privacy Notice
, we make no representations that the Service is appropriate or available for use in other locations. Those who access or use the Service from other jurisdictions do so at their own volition and are responsible for compliance with local law.
1. Compliance
To ensure you remain in compliance with these Terms and Conditions, VoiceThread recommends reviewing the current Terms and Conditions each time you access or use the Services. All access to and use of the Services and Accounts (including, but not limited to, the materials, content, information, and data contained on or provided through the Services and Accounts) are subject to compliance with these Terms and Conditions and all applicable laws, rules, and regulations. If you have any questions or comments regarding these Terms and Conditions or the Services, please contact VoiceThread at the contact information listed below. In addition, if you would like to report violations of these Terms and Conditions (including but not limited to violations by an individual User), please utilize the contact information listed below.
2. General Use
The Services are made available to you for your personal (noncommercial) and/or educational use and are subject to these Terms and Conditions, to allow you to (i) obtain information about the Services, (ii) register for an Account, and (iii) engage with the various interactive properties available on the Services. Subject to these Terms and Conditions, VoiceThread grants you a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and revocable license to download, access, and use the Services solely for the applicable purposes described in these Terms and Conditions and for your personal, non-commercial benefit. Except as otherwise expressly set forth herein, you shall have no other rights to the Services, and no other rights shall be implied.
3. Visitors to the Service and Account Creation
You may be able to visit certain public sections of the Services without identifying yourself or providing personal information. In order to access some features of the Services, you are required to register with the Services and select a username and password (create an “
Account
”). By registering for an Account, you represent and warrant that all registration information you submit is truthful and accurate. You may not have more than one (1) Account without VoiceThread’s permission, and you must access the Services and non-public portions of the Websites and Apps through your Account. The security and confidentiality of your Account username and password is your sole responsibility. You shall ensure that no unauthorized person shall have access to your Account, username, or password and shall immediately notify VoiceThread of any unauthorized access or use of which you become aware. You may not transfer your Account to anyone without the express prior written consent of VoiceThread. You agree to bear all responsibility and liability for all actions under or through your Account as well as all fees and/or charges incurred from the use of your Account, whether authorized or unauthorized. You may update your Account by changing the Account settings.
If you would like to delete your Account, you may do so at any time by contacting VoiceThread as described herein. When you delete your Account or a student’s Account, we delete the profile information and any other content those Accounts have provided to the Service. Information that you have shared with others, others have shared about you, or content others may have copied is not part of your Account and may not be deleted when you delete your Account. If you are an educator or school administrator using the ed.voicethread.com portion of the Services, you may delete any Account(s) you have administrative control over by logging into the management portal associated with your Account.
4. Registration Data
All of your information and data provided to VoiceThread in connection with registering for your Account (“
Registration Data
”) must be true, accurate, current, and complete at all times, and it is your responsibility to immediately update your Registration Data should any changes occur in order to keep it true, accurate, current, and complete. If you provide any information that is untrue, inaccurate, or incomplete, or if VoiceThread has reasonable grounds to suspect that such information is untrue, inaccurate, or incomplete, VoiceThread has the right to suspend or terminate your Account as described in these Terms. If you are registering for Accounts of behalf of others (e.g., an educator registering on behalf of students), you warrant that the appropriate permissions and authorizations have been received prior to such registration.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, you hereby authorize VoiceThread and its affiliates, contractors, and suppliers to use, copy, sublicense, and disclose Registration Data (i) as part of providing the Services; (ii) if required by applicable law, where necessary to enforce these Terms and Conditions, and/or to protect any of VoiceThread’s or other parties’ legal rights; (iii) in an aggregated form which does not include your identifying information; and (iv) as permitted by VoiceThread’s
Privacy Notice
. You are solely responsible for obtaining any necessary rights, authorizations, and/or consents with respect to your Registration Data, including, without limitation, to grant the foregoing rights to VoiceThread and its affiliates, contractors, and suppliers. If you provide VoiceThread your email address, you hereby consent to and authorize VoiceThread to (a) send notices regarding the Services to such email address, instead of notice by other means such as mail, and (b) send other messages to such email address, such as changes to features of the Services and special offers (collectively, “
Other Messages
”). If you do not want to receive Other Messages, you may opt out in the available email communications settings. Opting out of receiving Other Messages may prevent you from receiving email messages regarding updates, changes to the Services or offers.
5. Fees
We reserve the right, at any time, to change any fees or charges for Users (or to begin charging fees for any free service), provided that such changes will not apply to fees or charges paid prior to the time of the change. We will charge you sales tax as applicable to the Services or any order placed through the Services, based on your billing address. In addition, you will be responsible for all other taxes, levies, duties, or similar charges, only excluding taxes based on our income.
6. Changes to the Services
We reserve the right, at any time, to make changes to the Services. Such changes made include alterations to the features and functionality of the Websites and Apps, suspending or canceling certain portions of the Services offered, or limiting the Services that particular individuals or groups of individuals may access. Any change is made at the sole discretion of VoiceThread, except regarding changes to how Education Records are used or shared under these Terms and Conditions. VoiceThread will not make changes to the use of Education Records (as defined in the
Privacy Notice
) without advance notice and consent from the school official or academic institution relevant to such records, in a manner consistent with applicable law.
7. User Content
VoiceThread offers you a communications tool, and as such, the Services may contain User-generated or provided data, content, and materials (“
User Content
”).
User Content may include Education Records
. It may also include commentary in forums or discussion spaces, reviews on any portion of the Services, or other content shared in workshops or on your User Account. User Content is the sole responsibility of the User that submitted that User Content. VoiceThread does not control User Content generated or provided by Users and is under no circumstances responsible or liable in any way for any User Content that is made available through the Services. VoiceThread does not endorse any User Content, and does not warrant or guarantee the integrity, truthfulness, accuracy, quality, authenticity, or identity of any User Content. VoiceThread reserves the right (but is not obligated) to edit or remove any User Content in whole or part, at any time, and for any or no reason. You agree that VoiceThread is not liable for any loss or damage of any kind resulting from the availability, access, and/or use of any User Content. You acknowledge that all content accessed by you through the Services is at your own risk and you will be solely responsible for any damage or loss to any party resulting therefrom. You further agree that the User Content you may generate or provide through the Services shall be truthful and not misleading. You understand that you may not post or transmit any message, data, image or program that would violate the property rights of others, including unauthorized copyrighted text, images or programs, trade secrets or other confidential proprietary information, and trademarks or service marks used in an infringing fashion. You acknowledge and agree that your submitted User Content may be made available to other Users of the Services (subject to the features of the Service which may restrict what Users can view and access your User Content), however, VoiceThread does not guarantee publication of any User Content.
Your content is yours. In order to provide the Service, except as specifically limited in these Terms or the
Privacy Notice
, you hereby grant to VoiceThread and its affiliates, contractors, and suppliers a nonexclusive, perpetual, irrevocable (except as otherwise indicated herein or in the
Privacy Notice
), world-wide, royalty-free, assignable, and sublicensable (through multiple tiers), license to reproduce, copy, use, host, store, sublicense, reproduce, create derivative works from, modify, publish, edit, translate, distribute, perform and display, including digitally or electronically, your submitted User Content, (i) in connection your engagement with the Services, (ii) if required by applicable law, where necessary to enforce these Terms and Conditions and/or to protect any of VoiceThread’s or other parties’ legal rights, (iii) in an aggregated form which does not include your identifying information, and (iv) as permitted by VoiceThread’s
Privacy Notice
. You are solely responsible to obtain any necessary rights, authorizations, and consents with respect to your submitted User Content, including, without limitation, to grant the foregoing rights to VoiceThread and its affiliates, contractors, and suppliers. You retain all ownership rights you may have in User Content and VoiceThread does not claim any ownership rights in User Content. VoiceThread may use its license in User Content as necessary to perform or improve the Services, to evaluate metrics and analytics regarding User Content in an aggregated form (not personally identifiable) for marketing or business development purposes, for research or development, or any other purpose as permitted in the
Privacy Notice
.
The license you grant to VoiceThread to reproduce, copy, use, host, store, sublicense, reproduce, create derivative works from, modify, publish, edit, translate, distribute, perform and display User Content will terminate when (i) you delete such User Content with intellectual property rights, (ii) you or your organization deletes any personal information that may be considered User Content, or (iii) you delete your Account. If your content has been shared with others, and they have not deleted it or removed others’ access to it, then such User Content may still be available on the Services. When you delete User Content, Education Records, or personal information, it will be deleted in a manner similar to moving it to the recycle or trash folder on your computer or device. “Undo” features may be available for certain deletion events to enable deletion errors to be rectified before data is irretrievably lost, and, as such, deleted content may persist in backup copies for a reasonable period of time, though such deleted content will not be available to other Users. For more information, please see our
Deletion Policy
.
8. Releases
You acknowledge and agree that (i) you are solely responsible and liable for your interactions with other Users of the Services, (ii) VoiceThread does not control the acts, omissions, policies, or procedures of other Users of the Service. Without limiting the foregoing, you understand the risks associated with the access to and use of the Services and any User Content and other data, content and materials made available through the Services, and acknowledge that you are using the Services and such other data, content and materials at your own risk and that you are personally responsible for verifying their suitability for your needs. To the maximum extent permitted by law, VoiceThread is not liable for, and you hereby waive, release, relinquish and forever discharge VoiceThread, its employees, members, managers, governors, suppliers, agents, contractors, affiliates, representatives, successors and assigns (collectively, the “
VoiceThread Parties
”), from any and all claims, counterclaims, demands, causes of action, suits, liabilities, injuries to person or property (including, but not limited to, death, incapacity and disability), damages, losses, costs and expenses, whether known or unknown, liquidated or unliquidated, fixed or contingent, direct or indirect, arising out of or related to (a) your access to and use of the Services, (b) access to and use of any User Content and other data, content, and materials made available through the Services, (c) and your interactions with other Users of the Services. You agree to not sue VoiceThread and the other VoiceThread Parties, or assist any other person or entity in any suit against VoiceThread and the other VoiceThread Parties, with respect to any matters released in this Section or otherwise released in these Terms. The Terms of this release shall also apply to any of your relatives, next of kin, heirs, beneficiaries, employers, successors, or assigns who assert or attempt to assert any claims on your or their behalf.
9. Ownership and Intellectual Property
Except for certain User Content as described herein, all material included on the Services, including (without limitation) the text, software, scripts, graphics, photos, sounds, music, videos, interactive features, and the like (“
Content
”) are owned by or licensed to us, subject to copyright and other intellectual property rights under United States and foreign laws and international conventions. You acknowledge and agree that as between you and VoiceThread, VoiceThread is and shall remain the exclusive owner of the Services, VoiceThread’s data, information, and Content (expressly excluding User Content as otherwise described in these Terms and Conditions), and all patent, copyright, trade secret, trademark, and other intellectual property rights therein. In addition, the compilation and presentation of the Content on the Service is subject to copyright owned exclusively by us. Content on the Service may not be used, copied, reproduced, distributed, transmitted, broadcast, displayed, sold, licensed, or otherwise exploited for any other purposes whatsoever without our prior written consent. We reserve all rights not expressly granted in and to the Service and the Content. You agree to not engage in the use, copying, or distribution of any of the Content other than expressly permitted herein, including any use, copying, or distribution of User Content obtained through the Service for any commercial purposes. These Terms and Conditions do not grant you the right to use any VoiceThread marks. If you download or print a copy of the Content for personal use, you must retain all copyright and other proprietary notices contained therein and you expressly acknowledge that such use does not give you ownership in the Content or Services. You agree not to circumvent, disable, or otherwise interfere with security-related features of the Service or features that prevent or restrict use or copying of any Content or enforce limitations on use of the Service or the Content therein. You shall not challenge or assist any third party to dispute or challenge VoiceThread’s or its licensors’ ownership of such rights or the validity or enforceability of such rights. VoiceThread expressly reserves all rights not expressly set forth in these Terms and Conditions.
If you find or suspect intellectual property infringement with respect to the Services or User Content, please follow the procedure outlined in Section 10. If you believe that the Services or any User Content otherwise violate these Terms and Conditions, or have questions, complaints or claims regarding the Services, please immediately notify VoiceThread using the contact information located below. Upon receiving such information, VoiceThread will investigate the matter, in its sole discretion.
10. Reporting Copyright Infringement
Reporting Copyright Infringement. VoiceThread respects the intellectual property of others. If you believe that your work has been copied in a way that constitutes copyright infringement, or your intellectual property rights have been otherwise violated, please provide VoiceThread’s Copyright Agent the following information:
an electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of the copyright or other intellectual property interest;
a description of the copyrighted work or other intellectual property that you claim has been infringed upon;
a description of where the material that you claim is infringing is located in the Services;
your address, telephone number, and email address;
a statement by you that you have a good faith belief that the disputed use is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law;
and a statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the above information in your notice to VoiceThread is accurate and that you are the copyright or intellectual property owner or authorized to act on the copyright or intellectual property owner’s behalf.
VoiceThread’s Copyright Agent for Notice of claims of copyright or other intellectual infringement can be reached as follows: Copyright Agent c/o VoiceThread, 51020 Main Road, Route 25, Southold NY 11971, or by phone or fax at (253) 785-0036.
11. Prohibited Uses
In addition to uses otherwise prohibited by VoiceThread, these Terms and Conditions, or applicable law, you shall not, and you shall not allow any third party to, do any of the following:
Download, access, use or register for any portion of the Services if you are under thirteen (13) years old.
Download, access, use or register for the portion of the Services that is available on ed.voicethread.com if not approved and/or facilitated by a school official.
Bully, intimidate, or harass any User of the Services in any manner that is threatening, abusive, violent, or harmful to any person or entity, or invasive of another’s privacy.
Post User Content that is considered age-inappropriate based on the intended audience, hate speech, discriminatory, threatening, pornographic, inciting violence, or that contains nudity or graphic or gratuitous violence.
Change or delete any copyright or proprietary notices from the Services.
Use the Services other than as permitted by these Terms and Conditions and that you will not use the Services in a manner inconsistent with the original intent of its design.
To impersonate or attempt to impersonate VoiceThread, a VoiceThread employee, another authorized User, or any other person or entity.
Collect, solicit, or otherwise obtain registration information belonging to someone else.
Use or disclose User Content or other data, including personal information, about other Users without their prior consent or for unlawful purposes.
Access or use the Services to send unsolicited commercial messages to any person, or to threaten, harm or harass another User’s Account, use and/or access of the Services, including, but not limited to, attempting to gain access to another User’s Account.
Use the Services to engage in illegal multi-level marketing, such as a pyramid scheme.
Access or use the Services by artificial means or in a manner that, in VoiceThread’s sole discretion, would inflict an excessive load on VoiceThread’s or its suppliers’ hardware or software.
Post, upload or transmit: (i) any data, content or materials meant to market or advertise services or products that are competitive with the Services, solicit any other Users of the Services for such purposes and/or use data, content or materials gathered from the Services for such purposes, (ii) any data, content or materials of any type that infringe or violate any rights of any party, including, but not limited to, any patent, copyright, trademark, trade secret or any proprietary or other right of VoiceThread or a third party, (iii) any data, content or materials that are illegal, threatening, obscene, defamatory, harmful, invasive to privacy or otherwise violate the rights of VoiceThread or a third party, and/or (iv) any disabling code (defined as computer code designed to interfere with the normal operation of the Services or VoiceThread’s or a third party’s hardware or software) or any program routine, device or other undisclosed feature, including, but not limited to, a time bomb, virus, software lock, drop-dead device, malicious logic, worm, Trojan horse or trap door which is designed to delete, disable, deactivate, interfere with or otherwise harm the Services or VoiceThread’s or a third party’s hardware or software.
Use the Services for any benchmarking, monitoring, or testing availability or performance, or any other competitive use, including, but not limited to, creating services, products or software that are substantially similar to the Services.
Decompile, disassemble, or otherwise reverse engineer or attempt to reconstruct or derive any source code (or underlying ideas, algorithms, structure or organization), modify or create a derivative work of the Services by any means whatsoever.
Distribute, disclose, or allow use of any portion of the Services or your Account in any format through any timesharing device, service bureau, network or by any other means, to or by any third party.
Use or access any data, content, or materials for any purpose or in any manner other than real-time viewing (which prohibits, for example, screenshots, downloading and storing) unless expressly permitted by the features of the Services.
Use or access the Services or any data, content or materials provided through the Services in violation of international, federal, state, or local law or other applicable rules or regulations (including, without limitation, any laws regarding the export of data or software to and from the US and other countries). If you access the Services from outside the United States, you do so at your own risk and responsibility for compliance with laws of your jurisdiction.
To engage in any other conduct that restricts or inhibits anyone’s use or enjoyment of the Service, or which, as determined by us, may harm VoiceThread or Users of the Service or expose them to liability.
Any violation of the provisions of this Section 11 may result in termination, as described in Section 15.
12. Accessibility and Updates
Users are solely responsible for providing, maintaining, and ensuring compatibility with the basic access requirements for the Services, and all hardware, software, electrical or other physical requirements for use of the Services, including, without limitation, mobile devices, telecommunications and internet access, connections, web browsers or other equipment, programs and services required to download, access and use the Services. To use the Apps, you must have a compatible mobile device and VoiceThread does not guarantee that the Apps will be compatible with any specific mobile device. You are solely responsible for your mobile device data or related charges. VoiceThread may from time-to-time issue upgraded versions of the Apps and may automatically update the version of the Apps that you are using.
VoiceThread aims to comply with the accessibility standard in the latest version of published version of WCAG, Section 508 of the Rehabilitation Act, and EN 301 549 Accessibility requirements suitable for public procurement of ICT products and services in Europe. VoiceThread’s VPAT is available upon request. We make every effort to not interfere with the use of assistive technology or assistive devices. For any accessibility questions or to obtain a copy of our VPAT, contact accessibility@voicethread.net.
13. Third Party Content and Products
The Service may contain links to Third-Party Content (defined below) and other third-party websites that are not owned or controlled by VoiceThread. Links are provided to online Users solely as a convenience and our inclusion of such links does not imply any endorsement of the information by VoiceThread (e.g.
https://studentprivacypledge.org/privacy-pledge/
). In addition, as part of ordinary use of the Services, Users may share links to third party content or websites that are also subject to this provision. While VoiceThread does not permit posting age-inappropriate material and reserves the right to remove links or posts that are not appropriate, VoiceThread does not have a means to automatically delete such links, and there may be a time period where a link is available before it can be removed.
You acknowledge and agree that we have no control over linked sites and resources, are not responsible for the availability of linked sites or resources, and do not endorse and are not responsible or liable for any content, advertising, products, features, services, information, or other materials on or available from linked sites or resources, or any websites that they may link to (collectively, “
Third-Party Content
). We shall not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with use of or reliance on any Third-Party Content.
Access to the Services may include hardware, software, and other proprietary materials from VoiceThread’s third party suppliers that are subject to license rights, terms, and restrictions (collectively, “
Third-Party Licenses
”). In such event, your rights to the Services are expressly subordinate and subject to the Third-Party Licenses and you must comply with Third-Party Licenses. If VoiceThread’s rights provided by a third-party supplier are limited, suspended, or terminated for any reason, your rights shall also be so limited, suspended or terminated. To the extent of any conflict between the terms of these Terms and Conditions and the terms of a Third-Party License, the terms of the Third Party-License shall control with respect to the applicable third-party product.
14. Warranties
You represent and warrant that (i) these Terms and Conditions constitute your legal, valid and binding obligation enforceable against you in accordance with their terms, subject to the principles of equity, bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization and other laws affecting creditors’ rights generally, (ii) you have all requisite authority to enter into these Terms and Conditions, (iii) your agreement to these Terms and Conditions and performance or compliance with the terms of these Terms and Conditions will not conflict with, result in a breach of, constitute a default under or require the consent of any third party under any license, sublicense, lease, contract, agreement or instrument to which you or your affiliates are bound or to which your properties are subject, (iv) you are the lawful owner of any submitted User Content and your Registration Data, or to the extent you are not the lawful owner, you have all rights necessary for you to provide, upload and make available in submitted User Content and your Registration Data and license it as specified herein, (v) your submitted User Content and your Registration Data will not violate or in any way infringe on any patent, copyright, trade secret, trademark, intellectual property or other rights of a third party or another’s rights of publicity and privacy, (vi) your submitted User Content is not harmful, fraudulent, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortuous, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, or otherwise objectionable, and (vii) your submitted User Content does not violate any international, federal, state or local law, statute, ordinance, or regulation or which would render VoiceThread in violation of any applicable laws or regulations, including, without limitation COPPA and FERPA.
If you are entering these Terms and Conditions on behalf of an academic institution or other similar organization, you acknowledge and warrant that you are solely responsible for compliance with applicable provisions of COPPA when obtaining necessary consents for use of the Services.
15. Termination
Access to the Services is provided at the discretion of VoiceThread. VoiceThread has the right at any time, with or without prior notice, to suspend or terminate your access to the Services or your Account, and to refuse any and all current or future use of all or any portion thereof, for any reason, including, but not limited to, if VoiceThread believes that you are in violation of any of the provisions of these Terms and Conditions, your Account is being used without your authorization, or the information you have provided is inaccurate, not current or incomplete. VoiceThread shall also have the right, but not the obligation, at any time to change or discontinue any aspect or feature of the Services and/or change or remove any of the User Content from the Services, in its sole discretion. In the event you desire to terminate your Account you may do so through the Services or by contacting VoiceThread at the contact information provided herein. Upon termination of your Account, all of the information associated with your Account may be retained or deleted without notice, consistent with applicable law. VoiceThread shall have no liability for such deletion. You may not continue to use any portion of the Services following the termination of your Account.
16. Indemnification
To the fullest extent permitted by law, you shall indemnify, defend and hold VoiceThread and the other VoiceThread Parties harmless from and against any and all losses, liabilities, suits, actions, obligations, fines, damages, judgments, penalties, claims, causes of action, charges, costs and expenses (including, but not limited to, attorneys’ fees, disbursements and court costs prior to trial, at trial and on appeal) arising out of or resulting from, or alleged to result from (i) your breach of these Terms and Conditions, (ii) your access to and use of the Services, and/or (iii) your Content and your Registration Data; provided, the foregoing provisions of this Section shall not apply to the extent such losses, costs and expenses arise out of the gross negligence or willful misconduct of VoiceThread.
17. Disclaimers
EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY SET FORTH IN THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS, VOICETHREAD DOES NOT MAKE AND HEREBY DISCLAIMS ALL EXPRESS AND IMPLIED WARRANTIES, REPRESENTATIONS AND ENDORSEMENTS OF ANY KIND WHATSOEVER (INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT) WITH REGARD TO THE SERVICES, USER CONTENT OR ANY OTHER DATA, CONTENT AND MATERIALS CONTAINED IN OR PROVIDED THROUGH THE SERVICES. THE SERVICES AND USER CONTENT ARE PROVIDED ON AN “AS IS” BASIS. IF YOU ARE DISSATISFIED WITH THE SERVICES, USER CONTENT, THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OR ANY PORTION OF THE FOREGOING, YOUR SOLE AND EXCLUSIVE REMEDY IS TO DISCONTINUE USING THE SERVICES. VOICETHREAD DOES NOT GUARANTEE CONTINUOUS, UNINTERRUPTED OR SECURE ACCESS TO THE SERVICES, AND OPERATION OF THE SERVICES MAY BE INTERFERED WITH BY NUMEROUS FACTORS.
THIS SERVICE MAY CONTAIN TRANSLATIONS POWERED BY GOOGLE AND OR OTHER SERVICES. SUCH SERVICES DISCLAIM ALL WARRANTIES RELATED TO THE TRANSLATIONS, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING ANY WARRANTIES OF ACCURACY, RELIABILITY, AND ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND NONINFRINGEMENT.
CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW LIMITATIONS ON IMPLIED WARRANTIES OR THE EXCLUSION OR LIMITATION OF CERTAIN DAMAGES. IF YOU RESIDE IN SUCH A JURISDICTION, SOME OR ALL OF THE ABOVE DISCLAIMERS, EXCLUSIONS, OR LIMITATIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU AND YOU MAY HAVE ADDITIONAL RIGHTS.
18. Liability
SUBJECT TO THE OTHER LIMITATIONS AND DISCLAIMERS IN THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS, TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT SHALL VOICETHREAD OR ANY OTHER VOICETHREAD PARTIES BE LIABLE UNDER ANY LEGAL THEORY FOR (I) ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, CONSEQUENTIAL OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS, THE SERVICES OR USER CONTENT, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, INTEREST OR INTERRUPTION OF BUSINESS, EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, OR (II) ANY DAMAGES EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT OF ACTUAL, DIRECT DAMAGES INCURRED BY YOU, NOT TO EXCEED TWO HUNDRED AND FIFTY AND NO/100 DOLLARS ($250.00) OR THE FEES PAID FOR THE SERVICE OVER THE PAST 12 MONTHS, whichever is greater. THE EXISTENCE OF MULTIPLE CLAIMS SHALL NOT INCREASE THIS LIMIT. Any of your claims arising in connection with these Terms and Conditions, the Services or User Content must be brought within one (1) year of the date that the event giving rise to such action occurred.
19. Force Majeure
VoiceThread shall not be responsible for delays or failures of performance resulting from acts beyond its reasonable control. Such acts shall include, but are not limited to, acts of God, strikes, public internet and private internet connection failures, third party service providers, lockouts, riots, acts of war, acts of terror, epidemics, government regulations, fire, communication line failures, power failures, earthquakes, and other disasters.
20. Personal Information
VoiceThread may collect your personal and non-personal information when you download, register for, access and/or use the Services. You agree that VoiceThread may collect, process, transfer, use and disclose your information in accordance with VoiceThread’s
Privacy Notice
which is incorporated herein by reference and deemed a part hereof. VoiceThread will only share and or use your personally identifiable information in accordance with the
Privacy Notice
. If you are an organization or a member of an organization and you have registered for an Account and provided personal information on behalf of someone else (i.e., a student), you agree that you have received necessary authorizations and or parental consents to provide such information to VoiceThread.
21. Feedback
If you submit any ideas, concepts, feedback or related information concerning the Services to VoiceThread through the Services or by other means, you hereby grant, and/or warrant that the owner of such content or intellectual property has expressly granted to VoiceThread, a royalty-free, perpetual, irrevocable, world-wide, non-exclusive, transferable, sublicensable (through multiple tiers) license to reproduce, copy, use, create derivative works from, modify, publish, edit, translate, distribute, perform and display, including digitally or electronically, such content or intellectual property in any media or medium, or any form, format or forum now known or hereafter developed. By submitting such feedback, you acknowledge and agree that such feedback does not include confidential or proprietary information as VoiceThread is not under any obligation of confidentiality. You agree that you are not entitled any compensation or reimbursement of any kind under any circumstances.
22. Assignment
You may not assign or transfer these Terms and Conditions, or any of your rights or obligations hereunder, without the prior written consent of VoiceThread, and any attempted assignment or transfer without VoiceThread’s prior written consent shall be null and void. VoiceThread may assign these Terms and Conditions to an affiliate or the surviving entity or its successor in the event of its merger or the sale of all or substantially all of its assets. All of the terms and provisions of these Terms and Conditions shall be binding upon and shall inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective personal representatives, estates, heirs, successors and permitted assigns.
23. Governing Law
These Terms and Conditions shall be governed by, construed, and enforced according to the laws of the State of Florida, without regard to its conflict or choice of law principles. Any action arising out of or relating to these Terms and Conditions shall be brought only in the state or federal courts of Palm Beach County, Florida, and all parties expressly consent to such courts’ jurisdiction and irrevocably waive any objection with respect to the same.
24. Complete Agreement
Unless and solely to the extent that you or your organization are subject to a separate written agreement with VoiceThread that governs your use of the Services (in which case, such agreement will control), you agree that these Terms and Conditions are a complete and exclusive agreement between you and VoiceThread and these Terms and Conditions supersedes and cancels all previous written and oral agreements, communications, and other understandings relating to the subject matter contained herein. These Terms and Conditions may not be modified except as provided herein. Any subsequent versions of these Terms and Conditions posted on the Services will be deemed a writing signed by both parties.
25. Contact Information
Except as otherwise provided, notices under this Agreement shall be in writing and shall be deemed given three (3) business days after the date sent by certified mail, postage prepaid with return receipt requested, or when received via electronic mail, in each case to the respective party as set forth below.
To VoiceThread:
VoiceThread, Inc.
Attn: Legal Notices
VoiceThread
51020 Main Road, Route 25
Southold NY 11971
Email: support@voicethread.com
To you:
As specified in your Account information.
26. Miscellaneous
The failure of either party to exercise, in any respect, any right provided for herein shall not be deemed a waiver of any future rights hereunder. Section headings are not to be considered part of these Terms and Conditions. They are included solely for convenience and not intended to be full or accurate descriptions of the content hereof. Except as otherwise set forth herein, if any provision of these Terms and Conditions is found void or unenforceable, this will not affect the validity of the balance of these Terms and Conditions, which shall remain valid and enforceable, and the invalid or unenforceable provision shall be deemed superseded by a valid, enforceable provision that most closely matches the intent of the original provision. Except as stated herein, nothing in these Terms and Conditions is intended to confer upon any person other than the parties hereto, and their respective personal representatives, estates, heirs, successors and permitted assigns, any rights or remedies under or by reason of these Terms and Conditions. Any and all rights and obligations contained in these Terms and Conditions which by their nature and/or context are intended to survive termination of these Terms and Conditions shall so survive, including, but not limited to, perpetual license grants, indemnification, limitations of liability and disclaimers. No breach or right under these Terms and Conditions may be waived unless in writing signed by the waiving party. No agency, partnership, joint venture, or employment is created as a result of these Terms and Conditions, and you do not have the authority of any kind to bind VoiceThread in any respect whatsoever.
27. App Store
This Section 27 only applies to the Apps. You acknowledge and agree that the availability of the Apps is dependent on the third party from whom you received the Apps license, including, without limitation, the Apple App Store or Google Play (each an “
App Store
”).
These Terms and Conditions are only between you and VoiceThread, not an App Store. As between VoiceThread and an App Store, VoiceThread is solely responsible for the Apps and the Apps’ content.
Your license to the Apps set forth herein is limited to use of the Apps on products that you own or control and as permitted by the applicable App Store Terms and Conditions or terms of service.
To the extent that VoiceThread is responsible for any maintenance or support services with respect to the Apps under applicable law, you acknowledge that no App Store has any obligation whatsoever to furnish any such services.
The Apps are provided on an “AS-IS” basis. To the extent that any product warranties are not effectively disclaimed by these Terms and Conditions, VoiceThread is solely responsible for any such product warranties. In the event of any failure of the App to conform to any applicable warranty, you may notify the applicable App Store, and, if the App was purchased, such App Store may refund the purchase price for the Apps to you. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, no App Store will have any other warranty obligation whatsoever with respect to the Apps, and any other claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, or expenses attributable to any failure to conform to any warranty shall be VoiceThread’s sole responsibility.
Your claims are limited by these Terms and Conditions. To the extent you have any claims relating to the Apps, VoiceThread, not any App Store, is solely responsible for addressing such claims, including, but not limited to: (i) product liability claims, (ii) any claim that the App fails to conform to any applicable legal or regulatory requirement, and (iii) claims arising under consumer protection, privacy, or similar legislation.
VoiceThread shall not be obligated to indemnify, defend or hold you harmless from any third-party claims relating to the App. To the extent that VoiceThread is responsible to indemnify you under applicable law in the event of any third-party claim that the App or your possession and use of the App infringes that third party’s intellectual property rights, VoiceThread, not any App Store, shall be solely responsible for the investigation, defense, settlement and discharge of any such intellectual property infringement claim.
You represent and warrant that (i) you are not located in a country that is subject to a U.S. Government embargo, or that has been designated by the U.S. Government as a “terrorist supporting” country; and (ii) you are not listed on any U.S. Government list of prohibited or restricted parties.
Each App Store, including its subsidiaries, are third party beneficiaries of these Terms and Use, and upon your acceptance of these Terms and Conditions, each App Store will have the right (and will be deemed to have accepted the right) to enforce these Terms and Conditions against you as a third-party beneficiary.
28. Changes to Terms and Conditions
VoiceThread may modify these Terms and Conditions from time to time by posting an updated version of these Terms and Conditions and changing the “Date Last Modified” above. VoiceThread will also make it apparent via a notice, pop-up, or some other electronic method that changes were made to these Terms and Conditions. Such changes shall be effective within 30 days of posting, but you will always have the opportunity to object to new provisions and/or provide feedback on concerns regarding changes. Previous versions of these Terms and Conditions are available upon request, for a time frame consistent with your use of the Services.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://voicethread.com/privacy/:
voicethread
Home
Browse
Products
K-12
Higher Ed
Business
About
Features
Blog
Research
Jobs
How to
Contact
Training
Free Workshops
VT Certification
Digital Library
Sign in
Register
Privacy Notice
Date Last Updated: April 2024
VoiceThread services, including (without limitation) our websites
ed.voicethread.com
and
voicethread.com
, the VoiceThread mobile applications, and other interactive properties through which the services are delivered (collectively, the “Services”) are owned, operated and distributed by VoiceThread (referred to in this Privacy Notice as “VoiceThread” or “we” and through similar words such as “us,” “our,” etc.). This Privacy Notice outlines the personal information that VoiceThread may collect, how VoiceThread uses and safeguards that information, with whom we may share it, and your resources. The proceeding paragraphs may not be applicable to certain portions of the Services. The category of information that VoiceThread collects and how it’s used may vary depending on which website or feature of the Services you are utilizing.
While VoiceThread is available internationally and provided in a manner compliant with international privacy laws,
THIS SERVICE IS OFFERED FROM THE UNITED STATES (“US”)
and VoiceThread is a US-based company. If you use the Service, all information, including personal information, will be transferred to VoiceThread in the US and used as described in this Privacy Notice. Specific and detailed information about use internationally, including General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR"), can be found below.
While this policy applies broadly to all Users, specific guidance around children’s Personal Information, including exceptions to the general rules of personal information stated herein, can be found in the section labeled Children’s Privacy.
VoiceThread encourages our students, administrators, educators, customers, visitors, business associates, and any other interested parties to read this Privacy Notice, which applies to all Users. While VoiceThread makes every effort to maintain the accuracy of the personal information it holds through a variety of methods, the primary method for ensuring accurate data is facilitating your ability to correct the personal information we hold about you as described in this Notice. As such, we also encourage our Users to frequently review and update their personal information to ensure its accuracy. All corrections to personal information are made immediately upon submission, unless confirmation with the school or other parties is necessary in which case it could take up to 45 days, as defined by applicable privacy laws.
By using our Service or submitting personal information to VoiceThread by any other means, you acknowledge that you understand and agree to be bound by this Privacy Notice, and agree that VoiceThread may collect, process, transfer, use, and disclose your personal information as described in this Notice. Further, by accessing any part of the Service, you are agreeing to THE TERMS OF OUR TERMS AND CONDITIONS (the “Terms and Conditions”). IF YOU DO NOT AGREE WITH ANY PART OF THIS PRIVACY NOTICE OR OUR TERMS AND CONDITIONS, PLEASE DO NOT USE ANY PORTION OF THE SERVICES. Please note, this Privacy Notice is offered in multiple languages consistent with the version of the platform you are using. To ensure you are viewing in the appropriate language, please review this Notice as connected via your instance of the platform.
VoiceThread asserts no ownership rights over the personal information submitted via the Service, and such data ownership rights are retained by the individual Users or, in certain cases, the institutions with which individual Users are associated (e.g., schools, universities, school districts). VoiceThread does retain certain data licenses in order to provide the Services as described in the Terms and Conditions.
What personal information do we collect about you?
Personal information (also commonly known as personally identifiable information (PII) or personal data) is information that can be used to identify you, or any other individual to whom the information may relate. The types and amounts of information collected vary depending on whether you are a student, parent, educator, or school administrator. We will only collect, use, and share your personal information in accordance with this Privacy Notice.
The personal information that we may collect directly from those registering for the Service, includes the following categories:
Name and contact information (e.g. address; phone number; email);
Biometric data is not collected;
Account and Profile Information (e.g. password, profile picture);
Student and Class Information (e.g. class year, names of students, identity name);
School Information (e.g. school name, address, administrator contact);
Billing Information (e.g. credit card, bank account, billing contact information);
Order Information (e.g. current order/purchase information, purchase history, shipping details);
Company/employer information;
Geolocation and geotracking data is never collected. Regional location data may captured and stored for security, infrastructure, and customization use and planning but is never sold to any third parties;
Information contained in posts you make on the public forums and interactive features of the Service;
Information in our
Cookie Policy
, the degree to which such information is defined as personal information under the laws of a particular jurisdiction;
Other information that may be exchanged in the course of engaging with the Service. You will be aware of any subsequently collected information because it will come directly from you.
For the avoidance of doubt, any data (whether such data alone is considered personal or non-personal information) combined with or associated with your name or other identifier specific to you shall be treated as your personal information.
The Services are not intended to support the processing of health information (i.e. Personal Health Information (PHI)) as defined and protected under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA). As such, VoiceThread does not collect PHI and Users should not use the Services to upload, store, or otherwise process PHI.
VoiceThread is committed to providing you with easy ways to access, update, correct, or delete your information. You may access the personal information that VoiceThread has collected by accessing your information through your account or by contacting us as described herein. There are certain instances where VoiceThread may not be able to guarantee complete access due to legal restrictions or fulfill requests that are unreasonably difficult, repetitive, or impractical.
Collection of User Generated Content
The Service enables Users to post content on the Service, including your comments and any other information that you would like to be available on the Service, which may become public (“User Content”). User Content may include uploaded media (images, videos, presentations, documents, etc.), comments on uploaded media, reviews of the Services, messaging in private comments, and posts on public forums or discussion boards. If you do post content, all of the information that you post will be available to authorized personnel of VoiceThread and may be made available to the public as permitted by the capabilities of the Service and at your discretion. VoiceThread utilizes a cloud infrastructure to store and back-up any content uploaded to the Services. You expressly acknowledge and agree that we may access in real-time, record, and store archives of any User Content on our servers to make use of them in connection with your use of the Service. You retain all ownership rights in User Content as described in the Terms and Conditions, though VoiceThread may retain certain, limited license to use such User Content (though VoiceThread does NOT retain Copyright License). For more information about the license retained by VoiceThread, and when such license terminates, please review the Terms and Conditions. If you submit a review, recommendation, endorsement, or other User Content through the Service, or through other websites including Facebook, Instagram, Google, Yelp, and other similar channels, we may share that review, recommendation, endorsement, or content publicly on the Service.
No educator, school administrator, parent, or student profiles are made available to the general public through the Services. However, Users may choose to share information or content through the Services via publishing or sharing work they have created (such as VoiceThread conversations, participating in public Threadboxes, or submitting content to our Digital Library or other public venues for content). Please keep in mind that information (including your personal information or children's personal information) or content that you voluntarily disclose to others (including to other VoiceThread Users you interact with through the Service) can, like all digital information that appears on a screen, be viewed, copied, stored, and used by the people you share it with. We cannot control the actions of people with whom you choose to share information.
As an educator or school administrator, you can invite your students’ parents or outside subject matter experts to view or even comment on your students’ work. We will collect and store the names, email addresses, and phone numbers of those people, and those items will be treated as personal information in accordance with this Privacy Notice. If any individual that has been invited to the Services would like to remove their information from the system, they may contact VoiceThread as described herein.
Children’s Privacy
The Services provided by VoiceThread are designed to be suitable for education use in an academic setting, among other uses, and, as a result, children’s personal information may be collected. If you are under the age of 13, you are not permitted to register for an account on the Service or the Websites. You may only access and use the Services if an account has been created for you by an educator at your school. If you are under the age of 18, you are not permitted to register for an account on ed.voicethread.com and may only access and use the portion of the Services available on ed.voicethread.com if an account has been created on your behalf by an educator at your school. Before providing student access to any of the Services, VoiceThread obtains parental consent and/or relies on the parental consent obtained by a school or educator prior to student data being uploaded. Any such consent shall be consistent with the requirements of the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“COPPA”) for students under the age of 13. You may inquire with your school or with VoiceThread via the contact information in this Notice to understand how consent for a particular student is managed. If VoiceThread receives notice or discovers independently that information of a child under the age of 13 was collected without parental consent, that child’s personal information will be promptly deleted if consent cannot be confirmed or obtained within a reasonable time.
The portion of the Services available on ed.voicethread.com are dedicated for use with grade school students and educators. By themselves, children cannot create accounts on ed.voicethread.com; only school personnel may do so. As such, VoiceThread does not receive information directly from children, and we rely solely on school personnel to provide identity data about students. ed.voicethread.com requires a student’s educators and school administrators to have control and visibility over that student’s work. No student profile or student work is made available or visible to the public or to any other students by default, but educators may allow their students to share their work with other students, educators, school administrators in their school, and beyond. The option to share such student information is at the discretion of the educator, and students and parents should inquire with the educator about such sharing. In addition, Educators may share their own work with other students, educators, school administrators in their school, and beyond. Special controls available on the ed.voicethread.com portion of the Services include controls that allow school personnel to implement age-appropriate and individually appropriate sharing and publishing policies. For assistance on these control features, please see our
FAQ
on the subject or contact us as described herein.
There is a “
two-level-identity-policy
” available for students that allows a student’s identity name and image to be anonymized as locally appropriate while ensuring that all educators and administrators within the same school or district license can see the true name of the student. This two-level-identity system enables more schools to opt to allow their students to collaborate and publish with the appropriate level of anonymity, while also ensuring that students are working within a transparent environment. Educators may deploy this method when registering for student accounts.
VoiceThread abides by its
Student Privacy Pledge
in an effort to protect children’s information. As provided in this pledge, VoiceThread commits itself to periodic examinations of the security infrastructure and privacy practices, as well as compliance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (“FERPA”), the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“COPPA”), this Privacy Notice, and our
Terms and Conditions
.
What are the sources of personal information collected by VoiceThread?
When providing personal information to VoiceThread as described in this Notice, that personal information is collected directly from you, and you will know the precise personal information being collected by us. In addition, as indicated in this Privacy Notice, certain personal information may be collected from educators or school administrators in order to facilitate student access to the Services.
VoiceThread does not collect personal information from any other sources, except where it may automatically be collected by third-party service providers, e.g. analytics, security, and infrastructure monitoring services, though such collection will always be within the context of the Service.
How does VoiceThread use personal information?
Subject to the terms of this Privacy Notice, VoiceThread uses the above-described categories of personal information in several ways. Unless otherwise stated specifically, the above information may be used for any of the following purposes:
to administer the Services to you;
to respond to your requests for assistance;
to provide information to you about the Services;
to allow you to participate in surveys or provide testimonials (
Your testimonials are only published with your consent
);
to understand and improve the Services based on how the Services are operating and being utilized by you (
Here is a current list of analytics providers
);
to distribute communications relevant to your use of the Service, such as system updates or information about your use of the Services;
as may be necessary to support the operation of the Services, such as for billing, account maintenance, and record-keeping purposes;
for educator and administrator Users (i.e. over the age of 18) to send to you VoiceThread solicitations, product announcements, and the like that we feel may be of interest to you (you may “opt out” of receiving these marketing materials);
to notify you about changes to this Privacy Notice;
to carry out VoiceThread’s legal obligations and enforce rights arising from any contracts between you and VoiceThread;
to investigate and deter fraudulent activity;
in other manners after subsequent notice is provided to you and/or your consent is obtained, if necessary.
VoiceThread does not sell, re-sell, or distribute for re-sale your personal information
, however, VoiceThread may share aggregated, non-personally identifiable information publicly, including with Users, partners, or the press in its own discretion.
Other than as described herein, VoiceThread will not disclose your personal information for any purpose without your consent. VoiceThread is committed to transparency in its data privacy practices ensuring that you can make meaningful choices about how your personal information is used. For example, you may be able to opt-out of providing certain information, access and manage your account information within your account, control who you share information with, and delete or otherwise remove information. However, certain information must be provided in order for VoiceThread to provide the Services. Such information might include a valid email address or the name of the school you attend or are affiliated with.
How does VoiceThread share your personal information with third parties?
We may provide any of the described categories of personal information to VoiceThread employees, consultants, affiliates or other businesses or persons for the purpose of processing such information on our behalf in order to provide the Service to you. In such circumstances, we require that these parties agree to protect the confidentiality of such information consistent with the terms of this Privacy Notice, as well as comply with applicable laws and provide the same security protections as VoiceThread, including but not limited to adherence to deletion and other available requests. Third parties receiving personal information may include:
Third-party vendors or service providers providing crucial services and necessary to provide the Services to you (e.g. emailing on behalf of VoiceThread, database management services, database hosting, customer support software, and security);
Business partners, contractors, channel partners, subsidiaries, or other affiliated entities for specific purposes consistent with this Privacy Notice;
Certain third party applications, websites, and services may be integrated with our Services. As such, those integrated third-party service providers may receive information about what you post or share. For example, when you access your Google Drive or Flickr account in order to import work into a VoiceThread, Google and Flickr receive the information that you share through that functionality. Information collected through these third parties is subject to their respective terms and policies;
Government agencies or other parties in response to legal process or other requests, where permitted by law.
Third parties that receive your information are prohibited from using your personal information in any manner outside of providing services to VoiceThread. A list of the third parties we work with to provide the Services is available
here
.
For student Users (i.e., users under the age of 18), we will never sell, rent, or otherwise share your personal information with other, third-party companies for their commercial or marketing use.
In addition, we may release personal information: (i) to the extent we have a good-faith belief that such action is necessary to comply with any applicable law; (ii) to enforce any provision of the Terms of Service, protect ourselves against any liability, defend ourselves against any claims, protect the rights, property and personal safety of any User, or protect the public welfare; (iii) when disclosure is required to maintain the security and integrity of the Service, or to protect any User’s security or the security of other persons, consistent with applicable laws; (iv) to respond to a court order, subpoena, search warrant, or other legal process, to the extent permitted and as restricted by law; or (v) in the event that we go through a business transition, such as a merger, divestiture, acquisition, liquidation or sale of all or a portion of our assets. At no time is personal information stored outside the control of VoiceThread, as VoiceThread either exercises direct or contractual control of personal information at all times.
In the event that VoiceThread or its assets are acquired by or merged with a third party, personal information would be one of the assets transferred to or acquired by that third party. In such circumstances, this Privacy Notice would continue to apply to your personal information and any acquirer would only be able to handle your personal information as per this Notice unless you consent otherwise. We will provide you with notice of acquisition within thirty (30) days following the completion of such transaction by posting on the Services or via the email associated with your account. If you do not consent to the use of your personal information by the third-party successor company, you may request deletion from the Services. In the unlikely event that VoiceThread ceases operations or files for bankruptcy, we will protect your information and will not sell your personal information to any third party.
How does VoiceThread communicate with you?
If you are registered for the Services and provided an email or phone number, opted-in to receive communications from VoiceThread, or created VoiceThread conversations and invited others to comment on them, we may send you messages via social media updates, SMS, push notifications, and or email. If you invite another person to join you on the Services by adding them as a contact and providing their email address or phone number, we may contact them regarding the Services using email or SMS. If they would prefer to not receive such communications, they may opt-out using instructions contained in those communications. Your notification preferences may be viewed and adjusted within your account settings.
If you no longer wish to receive correspondence, emails, or other communications from us, you may opt-out by submitting a request through one of the following means:
using the UNSUBSCRIBE link in any email communication you may have received;
noting your preferences at the time you register your account with our Service;
logging into your account settings and updating your preferences;
contacting us using the contact information provided below.
For educator and administrator Users engaged with the VoiceThread products (i.e. Users over the age of 18), we may use third party marketing providers to market or promote our products and services. If you no longer wish to receive emails, SMSs, facsimile messages, or other communications from such third parties, you are responsible for contacting the third party directly. VoiceThread will never contact student Users (i.e. Users under the age of 18) with any marketing communication.
VoiceThread does not permit third-party contextual advertisements, marketing, or other third-party promotion on the Services.
How long does VoiceThread retain your personal information?
ed.voicethread.com
The length of time that student data is kept on the Service is up to educators and administrators of the license under which the students are working. Administrators of the license have absolute control over the student accounts. We only keep a student’s personal information for as long as administrators of the license allow it. At any time, an administrator can delete a student’s account and all of their work. When a classroom, school, or district license expires, we give a 60-day grace period within which the administrators can decide how to manage student accounts and their work. There are three options, listed in order of our preference, but all options are available to administrators:
Hand the student’s account off to parents. A simple email change and password reset prior to removing the student’s account from the license enables parents to take control of the student’s work. Parents generally love this option because it allows them to keep copies of often priceless student work.
Change the passwords for all the student accounts but keep the accounts and the work they’ve accomplished archived for record keeping and sharing purposes.
Delete the student's account and all their personal work on the Service, including comments, presentations, etc.
VoiceThread
VoiceThread will retain your personal information only for as long as is necessary for the purposes set out in this Privacy Notice. We will retain and use personal information to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations (for example, if we are required to retain your data to comply with applicable laws), resolve disputes and enforce our legal agreements and policies. To determine the appropriate retention period for your personal information, we will consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal information, the purposes for which we use your personal information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements. Unless we are obligated to retain all or some of your personal information, deleting an account may remove your personal information from the Services.
VoiceThread will also retain usage data for internal analysis purposes. Usage data is generally retained for a shorter period of time, except when this data is used to strengthen the security or to improve the functionality of our Sites and/or Portals, or we are legally obligated to retain this data for longer periods.
International Data Transfer
If you are located outside the United States, in particular if you are located in Canada, Brazil, the European Union (“EU”), the European Economic Area (“EEA”), New Zealand, the Republic of South Africa, Switzerland, the United Kingdom, or other countries with similar data privacy laws, please note that we and our servers are located in the United States. Any information that you provide to us may be transferred to and processed in the United States or other countries around the world where we do business. Although this may include recipients of information located in countries where there may be a lower level of legal protection for your personal information than in your country, we will make efforts to protect your information in accordance with requirements applicable to the law in your particular jurisdiction and take steps to only share with third parties that offer similar protection. By using our Service, you unambiguously consent to your information being collected, processed, used, and transferred as disclosed herein.
Data Privacy Rights (European Union and Similar Jurisdictions)
If you are located in the EU or a jurisdiction with a similar law, the GDPR or its local equivalent may grant you certain rights under the law. In particular, the right to access, correct, and delete the personal information we hold about you. VoiceThread will retain your personal information for the length of time you engage with our services as described in the retention section of this Notice, until you request deletion of such personal information. VoiceThread is considered the Data Controller (or equivalent distinction) with regard to your personal information. You can find our contact information as described herein or in other portions of the Service.
In certain circumstances, you have the following data protection rights:
The right to access, update, or delete the personal information we have on you.
The right of rectification. You have the right to have your personal information rectified if that information is inaccurate or incomplete.
The right to object. You have the right to object to our processing of your personal information.
The right of restriction. You have the right to request that we restrict the processing of your personal information.
The right to data portability. You have the right to be provided with a copy of the personal information we have on you in a structured, machine-readable and commonly used format.
The right to withdraw consent. You also have the right to withdraw your consent at any time where we relied on your consent to process your personal information.
In order to make a request regarding your personal information, please
contact us here
.
If you have a comment, question, or complaint about how we are handling your personal information, we hope that you contact us as described herein order to allow us to resolve the matter. In addition, if you are located in the EEA, you may submit a complaint regarding the processing of your personal information to a regulatory authority. The following links may assist you in finding the appropriate regulator:
In the UK, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner:
ico.org.uk
In South Africa, you have the right to file a complaint with the Information Regulator:
inforegulator.org.za
In Switzerland, you have the right to contact the Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner:
FDPIC
In the EU, you have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority. To find your local authority, you can check the list on the European Data Protection Board website:
edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/about-edpb/members_en
In Brazil, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the National Data Protection Authority:
ANPD
In Argentina, you have the right to contact the National Directorate for Personal Data Protection:
PDP
In Canada, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the Office of the Privacy Commissioner in Canada:
priv.gc.ca/en/
In Japan, you have the right to contact the personal information Protection Commission:
ppc.go.jp/en/
In Australia, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the Privacy Commissioner:
Australian Information Commissioner
In New Zealand, you can contact the Privacy Commissioner’s office:
privacy.org.nz/
Legal Basis for Processing under GDPR
If you are located in the EEA or a jurisdiction that requires a similar legal basis for processing, our legal basis for collecting and using the personal information described in this Notice depends on the personal information we collect and the specific context in which we collect it.
We may process personal information because:
We need to perform a contract with you;
You have given us consent to do so;
The processing is in our legitimate interest to offer the Service, when that legitimate interest is not overridden by your rights;
To comply with the law.
Where personal information is processed based on consent, you may have the right to withdraw such consent at any time. To do so, please contact us as described in this Notice. If there is a different legal basis that would permit us to continue processing your personal information after withdrawing consent, we will notify you of that legal basis at the time of your request.
Your State Privacy Rights and Additional Disclosures
Depending on the state in which you reside, you may have certain privacy rights regarding your personal information. If you are a California resident, please see our “Notice to California Residents” section below. For other state residents, your privacy rights may include (if applicable):
The right to confirm whether or not we are processing your personal information and to access such personal information;
The right to obtain a copy of your personal information that we collected from and/or about you in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the information to another controller without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means;
The right to delete personal information that we collected from and/or about you, subject to certain exceptions;
The right to correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you, subject to certain exceptions;
The right, if applicable, to opt out of the processing of your personal information for purposes of (1) targeted advertising; (2) the “sale” of your personal information (as that term is defined by applicable law); and (3) profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you (
NOTE: while VoiceThread is obligated by state law to disclose this right, VoiceThread does NOT conduct targeted advertising, does not sell, and does not conduct profiling
);
If we are required by applicable law to obtain your consent to process sensitive personal information, the right to withdraw your consent; and
The right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of your privacy rights.
You may submit a request regarding your rights by
contacting us here
or by calling us at (888) 407-3929. If you submit a request to delete online, you may be asked to confirm separately that you want your personal information deleted.
Notice to California Residents
The California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (“CCPA”), requires that we provide California residents with a privacy policy that contains a comprehensive description of our online and offline practices regarding the collection, use, disclosure, sale, sharing, and retention of personal information and of the rights of California residents regarding their personal information. This section of the Privacy Notice is intended solely for, and is applicable only to, California residents.
The CCPA defines “personal information” to mean information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular California resident or household. Personal information does not include publicly available, deidentified or aggregated information or lawfully obtained, truthful information that is a matter of public concern. For purposes of this “Notice to California Residents” section we will continue refer to this information as “personal information,” as previously defined.
We currently collect and, in the 12 months prior to the effective date of this Privacy Notice, have collected the categories of personal information described above in this Notice and for the purposes described in this Notice. We collect personal information directly from California residents or as otherwise described here (e.g. from your school). We do not collect all categories of personal information from each source.
Sale, Sharing, Disclosure, and Retention of Personal Information under CCPA
The CCPA defines “sale” as the transfer of personal information for monetary or other valuable consideration. VoiceThread does not engage in any activity that would be defined as a “sale” of data under CCPA.
We have only shared personal information to third parties for the purposes defined above in the section of this Notice entitled “How does VoiceThread share your personal information with third parties?”
We retain your personal information based on the VoiceThread Service you use the length of time as described in the section of this Notice entitled “How long does VoiceThread retain your personal information?”.
Your Rights under CCPA
If you are a California resident, you have the following rights with respect to your personal information:
The right to know what personal information we have collected about you, including the categories of personal information, the categories of sources from which we collected personal information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling or sharing personal information (if applicable), the categories of third parties to whom we disclose personal information (if applicable), and the specific pieces of personal information we collected about you;
The right to delete personal information that we collected from you, subject to certain exceptions;
The right to correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you;
If we sell or share personal information, the right to opt out of the sale or sharing (
NOTE: while VoiceThread is obligated by state law to disclose this right, VoiceThread does NOT “sell” or “share” personal information as defined by CCPA
);
If we use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those allowed by the CCPA and its regulations, the right to limit our use or disclosure;
The right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of privacy rights the CCPA confers.
How to Submit a Request to Know, Delete, and/or Correct under CCPA
You may submit a request regarding your rights by
contacting us here
or by calling us at (888) 407-3929. If you submit a request to delete online, you may be asked to confirm separately that you want your personal information deleted.
If you are submitting a request on behalf of a California resident, please submit the request through one of the designated methods discussed above. After submitting the request, we may require additional information to verify your authority to act on behalf of the California resident.
Our Process for Verifying a Request to Know, Delete, and/or Correct under CCPA
If we determine that your request is subject to an exemption or exception, we will notify you of our determination. If we determine that your request is not subject to an exemption or exception, we will comply with your request upon verification of your identity and, to the extent applicable, the identity of the California resident on whose behalf you are making such request.
If you maintain a password-protected account, we may verify your identity through existing authentication practices available through your account. Prior to disclosing or deleting the personal information, we will ask you to re-authenticate yourself with respect to that account.
Erasure Law
If you are a California resident under the age of 18 and a registered user of the Services, California Business & Professions Code § 22581 permits you to request and obtain removal of content or information posted on the Services by you. If you wish to make a request, please contact us as described in this Notice.
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA)
The Service may create, receive from or on behalf of School Personnel (as defined by FERPA), or have access to, information about students that is considered an education record (“Education Record”) and subject to the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act ("FERPA"), 20 U.S.C. Section 1232g (collectively, the "FERPA Records"). VoiceThread represents, warrants, and agrees that it will:
Hold the FERPA Records in strict confidence and will not use or disclose the FERPA Records except as (a) permitted or required by the Terms and this Privacy Notice, (b) required by law, or (c) otherwise authorized by School Personnel in writing;
Safeguard the FERPA Records according to commercially reasonable administrative, physical and technical standards that are no less rigorous than the standards by which VoiceThread protects its own confidential information;
Continually monitor its operations and take any action necessary to assure that the FERPA Records are safeguarded in accordance with the Terms and this Privacy Notice;
Not read the contents of any such files it receives with FERPA Records in the VoiceThread Service, except as necessary to process the transaction thru the system or store the data as part of Service;
Use FERPA Records only for the purposes for which they were intended;
Provide an administrative mechanism enabling School Personnel to destroy all of an institution’s FERPA Records that are stored on the service.
The Service will never share Education Records with third parties except (i) as directed by School Personnel (i.e. teacher sharing with another teacher or parent); or (ii) to our service providers that are necessary for us to provide the Service, as stated in the Terms and this Privacy Notice. A list of our current essential service providers is located here. Education Records are never used or disclosed for third-party advertising or any kind of first- or third-party behaviorally-targeted advertising to students or parents. Additionally, information collected directly from a student using VoiceThread is never used or disclosed for third party advertising, or any kind of first- or third-party behaviorally targeted advertising to the student, and personal information collected from a student is never sold or rented to anyone. This section shall not be construed (i) to limit the ability of VoiceThread to use student information or Educational Records for adaptive learning or customized student learning purposes.
In addition, the Service may use Education Records that have been De-Personalized (stripped of data that could be used to identify the the person described in the Educational Record) for product development, research or other purposes (“De-Personalized Data”). Such De-Personalized Data will have all personal identifiers removed, including, but is not limited to, name, date of birth, demographic information, geolocation information, and school name.
Information Security and User Responsibility
We employ industry-standard security measures designed to protect the security of all information submitted through the Service. For example, VoiceThread deploys industry standard encryption for all data in transit and at rest (in storage). Further, VoiceThread periodically reviews information, collection, storage, and processing practices, continually develops and improves encryption practices, and works with outside security experts to periodically test VoiceThread’s Services for vulnerabilities. However, the security of information transmitted through the internet or via a mobile device can never be guaranteed. We are not responsible for any interception or interruption of any communications through the internet or for changes to or losses of data. If VoiceThread learns of a security breach, we will attempt to notify you electronically (subject to applicable laws) so that you can take appropriate proactive steps. Depending on where you live, you may have a legal right to receive notice of a security breach.
Your VoiceThread accounts are protected by password. Passwords should be appropriately robust to help prevent unauthorized access. Users of the Service are responsible for maintaining the security of any password, user ID or other form of authentication involved in obtaining access to password protected or secure areas of the Service. In order to protect you and your information, we may suspend your use of any of the Service, without notice, pending an investigation, if any breach of security is suspected.
External Links
The Service may contain links to other websites maintained by third parties. Please be aware that we exercise no control over linked sites and VoiceThread is not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of such sites. Each linked site maintains its own independent privacy and data collection policies and procedures, and you are encouraged to view the privacy policies of these other sites before providing any personal information. While VoiceThread does not permit posting age-inappropriate material and reserves the right to remove links or posts that are not appropriate, VoiceThread does not have a means to automatically delete such links, and there may be a time period where a link is available before it can be removed.
Depending on the preferences set by a school or district utilizing ed.voicethread.com, the Services may offer social media features such as the Facebook “share” buttons or the Twitter “tweet” button. These social media features may collect a User’s IP address, web pages visited, and may set a cookie to enable functionality. At no time will Users’ login credentials, password, or other login data be shared with any third-party site. Social media features and widgets are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing such feature.
You hereby acknowledge and agree that VoiceThread is not responsible for the privacy practices, data collection policies and procedures, or the content of such third-party sites, and you hereby release VoiceThread from any and all claims arising out of or related to the privacy practices, data collection policies and procedures, and/or the content of such third-party sites.
Changes to this Privacy Notice
VoiceThread reserves the right to modify this Privacy Notice from time to time in order that it accurately reflects the regulatory environment and our data collection principles. When material changes are made to this Privacy Notice, VoiceThread will post the revised Notice on our website and/or notify you via the Services or through the email address associated with your account. If the material changes to this Notice impact student Users (i.e. Users under 18), such changes will only be undertaken after appropriate parental consent is obtained by VoiceThread or facilitated through the students’ educators or schools.
If you do not agree with any changes made to this Privacy Notice, you may terminate your account. Continued use of the Services after this Privacy Notice has been changed constitutes an acceptance of the updated Privacy Notice. Previous versions of this Privacy Notice are available upon request, for a time frame consistent with your use of the Services.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Notice or the Service provided by VoiceThread, please contact us using one of the following:
Web Form:
https://voicethread.com/support/contact
Phone: (888)-407-3929
Mail: 51020 Main Road, Route 25
Southold NY 11971
Sub-policy 1
https://studentprivacypledge.org/privacy-pledge/:
Skip to Main Content
Legacy Privacy Pledge
Note: An updated version of the Student Privacy Pledge – Pledge 2020 – is available at
this link
.
K-12 School Service Provider Pledge to Safeguard Student Privacy
Download a PDF copy of the Pledge
K-12 school service providers are honored to be entrusted by educators and families to support their educational needs and school operations. School service providers take responsibility to both support the effective use of student information and safeguard student privacy and information security.
School service providers support schools – including their teachers, students and parents – to manage student data, carry out school operations, support instruction and learning opportunities, and develop and improve products/services intended for educational/school use. In so doing, it is critical that schools and school service providers build trust by effectively protecting the privacy of student information and communicating with parents about how student information is used and safeguarded.
We pledge to carry out responsible stewardship and appropriate use of student personal information according to the commitments below and in adherence to all laws applicable to us as school service providers.
We Commit To:
✘
Not collect, maintain, use or share student personal information beyond that needed for authorized educational/school purposes, or as authorized by the parent/student.
✘
Not sell student personal information.
✘
Not use or disclose student information collected through an educational/school service (whether personal information or otherwise) for behavioral targeting of advertisements to students.
✘
Not build a personal profile of a student other than for supporting authorized educational/school purposes or as authorized by the parent/student.
✘
Not make material changes to school service provider consumer privacy policies without first providing prominent notice to the account holder(s) (i.e., the educational institution/agency, or the parent/student when the information is collected directly from the student with student/parent consent) and allowing them choices before data is used in any manner inconsistent with terms they were initially provided; and not make material changes to other policies or practices governing the use of student personal information that are inconsistent with contractual requirements.
✘
Not knowingly retain student personal information beyond the time period required to support the authorized educational/school purposes, or as authorized by the parent/student.
✔
Collect, use, share, and retain student personal information only for purposes for which we were authorized by the educational institution/agency, teacher or the parent/student.
✔
Disclose clearly in contracts or privacy policies, including in a manner easy for parents to understand, what types of student personal information we collect, if any, and the purposes for which the information we maintain is used or shared with third parties.
✔
Support access to and correction of student personally identifiable information by the student or their authorized parent, either by assisting the educational institution in meeting its requirements or directly when the information is collected directly from the student with student/parent consent.
✔
Maintain a comprehensive security program that is reasonably designed to protect the security, privacy, confidentiality, and integrity of student personal information against risks – such as unauthorized access or use, or unintended or inappropriate disclosure – through the use of administrative, technological, and physical safeguards appropriate to the sensitivity of the information.
✔
Require that our vendors with whom student personal information is shared in order to deliver the educational service, if any, are obligated to implement these same commitments for the given student personal information.
✔
Allow a successor entity to maintain the student personal information, in the case of our merger or acquisition by another entity, provided the successor entity is subject to these same commitments for the previously collected student personal information.
Notes:
Some school service providers may be subject to additional legal obligations, contractual commitments, or requests from educational institutions or parents/students that direct or otherwise authorize additional uses of student data, other than those specified above.
Nothing in this pledge is intended to prohibit the use of student personal information for purposes of adaptive learning or customized education.
This pledge is intended to be applicable to new contracts and policies going forward and addressed — where inconsistent and as agreed to by the educational institution or agency — in existing contracts as updated over time.
This pledge shall be effective as of January 1, 2015.
Definitions:
‘School service provider’ refers to any entity that: (1) is providing, and is operating in its capacity as a provider of, an online or mobile application, online service or website that is both designed and marketed for use in United States elementary and secondary educational institutions/ agencies and is used at the direction of their teachers or other employees; and (2) collects, maintains or uses student personal information in digital/electronic format. The term ‘school service provider’ does not include an entity that is providing, and that is operating in its capacity as a provider of, general audience software, applications, services or websites not designed and marketed for schools.
‘Educational/School purposes’ are services or functions that customarily take place at the direction of the educational institution/agency or their teacher/employee, for which the institutions or agency would otherwise use its own employees, and that aid in the administration or improvement of educational and school activities (e.g., instruction, administration, and development and improvement of products/services intended for educational/school use).
‘Student personal information’ is personally identifiable information as well as other information when it is both collected and maintained on an individual level and is linked to personally identifiable information.
‘Student’ applies to students of United States elementary and secondary schools, and with regard to notice and consent applies only to students of appropriate age as authorized under relevant United States federal law.
‘Consumer privacy policies’ include those privacy policies that are posted by the company to be available to all users to the site or service.
‘Parent’ includes a student’s legal guardian.
This Pledge is neither intended as a comprehensive privacy policy nor to be inclusive of all requirements to achieve compliance with all applicable federal or state laws. For more information, visit
https://studentprivacypledge.org
.
The Pledge
Expand Navigation
Legacy Privacy Pledge
Privacy Pledge (Spanish)
Apply To The Pledge
Signatories
Guidelines & FAQs
Press Releases
Close Modal